Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5316.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1631. The county in which the seat of state government is located is a proper county in which to commence and try the following actions: (a) when the action is commenced by the attorney general in the name of the state or of the people of the state for the use and benefit thereof; (b) when an action if venue cannot be laid under any other of the venue provisions.provision.